Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.080

Commission—Order of removal—Vacancy.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The governor may remove a member of the *commission for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or for incompetency or unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW. Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of the *commission has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or of incompetency or unprofessional conduct, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the member. If a vacancy occurs on the *commission, the governor shall appoint a replacement member to fill the remainder of the unexpired term.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 408.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.